Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 22. Irradiation of Foods

§ 201.
Labeling of irradiated foods.

All fruits, vegetables, meats, poultry, eggs, dairy products, and other natural and processed products offered for sale at retail or wholesale in Vermont for human or animal consumption which indicate pursuant to federal law that they have been subjected to an irradiation process shall be labeled “Treated with radiation” or “Treated by irradiation.”

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 202.
Penalty.

Each day the provisions of this chapter are violated shall constitute a separate civil offense.
Anyone found in violation of this chapter shall be fined not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.).